Washington statutes.
RCW 18.360.010

Definitions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Administer" means the retrieval of medication, and its application to a patient, as authorized in RCW 18.360.050.

(2) "Delegation" means direct authorization granted by a licensed health care practitioner to a medical assistant to perform the functions authorized in this chapter which fall within the scope of practice of the health care provider and the training and experience of the medical assistant.

(3) "Department" means the department of health.

(4) "Forensic phlebotomist" means a police officer, law enforcement officer, or employee of a correctional facility or detention facility, who is certified under this chapter and meets any additional training and proficiency standards of his or her employer to collect a venous blood sample for forensic testing pursuant to a search warrant, a waiver of the warrant requirement, or exigent circumstances.

(5) "Health care practitioner" means:

(a) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW;

(b) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW; or

(c) Acting within the scope of their respective licensure, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, a registered nurse or *advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, a physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, or an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW.

(6) "Medical assistant-certified" means a person certified under RCW 18.360.040 who assists a health care practitioner with patient care, executes administrative and clinical procedures, and performs functions as provided in RCW 18.360.050 under the supervision of the health care practitioner.

(7) "Medical assistant-EMT" means a person certified under RCW 18.360.040 who performs functions as provided in RCW 18.360.050 under the supervision of a health care practitioner and holds: An emergency medical technician certification under RCW 18.73.081; an advanced emergency medical technician certification under RCW 18.71.205; or a paramedic certification under RCW 18.71.205.

(8) "Medical assistant-hemodialysis technician" means a person certified under RCW 18.360.040 who performs hemodialysis and other functions pursuant to RCW 18.360.050 under the supervision of a health care practitioner.

(9) "Medical assistant-phlebotomist" means a person certified under RCW 18.360.040 who performs capillary, venous, and arterial invasive procedures for blood withdrawal and other functions pursuant to RCW 18.360.050 under the supervision of a health care practitioner.

(10) "Medical assistant-registered" means a person registered under RCW 18.360.040 who, pursuant to an endorsement by a health care practitioner, clinic, or group practice, assists a health care practitioner with patient care, executes administrative and clinical procedures, and performs functions as provided in RCW 18.360.050 under the supervision of the health care practitioner.

(11) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.

(12)(a) "Supervision" means supervision of procedures permitted pursuant to this chapter by a health care practitioner who is physically present and is immediately available in the facility, except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection.

(b) The health care practitioner does not need to be present during procedures to withdraw blood, administer vaccines, or obtain specimens for or perform diagnostic testing, but must be immediately available.

(c)(i) During a telemedicine visit, supervision over a medical assistant assisting a health care practitioner with the telemedicine visit may be provided through interactive audio and video telemedicine technology.

(ii) When administering intramuscular injections for the purposes of treating a known or suspected syphilis infection in accordance with RCW 18.360.050, a medical assistant-certified or medical assistant-registered may be supervised through interactive audio or video telemedicine technology.

[2024 c 248 s 2; 2024 c 217 s 1; 2023 c 134 s 1; 2021 c 44 s 2; (2021 c 44 s 1 expired July 1, 2022); 2020 c 80 s 26. Prior: 2017 c 336 s 14; 2016 c 124 s 1; 2012 c 153 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

(2) This section was amended by 2024 c 217 s 1 and by 2024 c 248 s 2, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Intent—Effective date—2024 c 248: See notes following RCW 18.360.050.

Effective date—2023 c 134: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 20, 2023]." [2023 c 134 s 4.]

Effective date—2021 c 44 s 2: "Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1, 2022." [2021 c 44 s 5.]

Effective date—2021 c 44 s 1: "Section 1 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 14, 2021]." [2021 c 44 s 3.]

Expiration date—2021 c 44 s 1: "Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2022." [2021 c 44 s 4.]

Effective date—2020 c 80 ss 12-59: See note following RCW 7.68.030.

Intent—2020 c 80: See note following RCW 18.71A.010.

Finding—2017 c 336: See note following RCW 9.96.060.

Effective date—2012 c 153 ss 1-12, 14, 16, and 18: See note following RCW 18.360.005.

Rules—2012 c 153: See note following RCW 18.360.005.